Maryland, session 2026, SB0716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–608.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(10) “Law enforcement officer” means:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0716*

SENATE BILL 716
(i) A law enforcement officer as defined in § 1–101 of the Public
Safety Article;
(ii) The Police Commissioner of Baltimore City;
(iii) An individual who serves at the pleasure of the Police
Commissioner of Baltimore City;
(iv) The police chief of a county law enforcement agency;
(v) The police chief of a municipal corporation;
(vi) The police chief or superintendent of a State law enforcement
agency;
(vii) The sheriff of a county;
(viii) An officer who is on probationary status on initial entry into a
law enforcement agency;
(ix) A correctional officer as defined in § 8–201 of the Correctional
Services Article; [or]
(x) Any federal law enforcement officer who exercises the powers set
forth in § 2–104 of the Criminal Procedure Article; OR
(XI) A SPECIAL POLICE OFFICER FOR THE MARYLAND
JUDICIARY, COMMISSIONED UNDER TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY
ARTICLE.
(b) An application filed in the District Court that requests that a statement of
charges be filed against a law enforcement officer, emergency services personnel, an adult
protective services worker, a child welfare caseworker, or an educator for an offense
allegedly committed in the course of executing the duties of the law enforcement officer,
emergency services personnel, adult protective services worker, child welfare caseworker,
or educator shall immediately be forwarded to the State’s Attorney.
(c) (1) Upon receiving an application filed in District Court requesting that a
statement of charges be filed against a law enforcement officer, emergency services
personnel, an adult protective services worker, a child welfare caseworker, or an educator,
the State’s Attorney shall:
(i) Investigate the circumstances of the matter; and
(ii) Make a recommendation to the District Court Commissioner as
to whether a statement of charges should be filed against the law enforcement officer,

SENATE BILL 716 3
emergency services personnel, adult protective services worker, child welfare caseworker,
or the educator.
(2) If the State’s Attorney recommends to a District Court Commissioner
that a statement of charges be filed against a law enforcement officer, emergency services
personnel, an adult protective services worker, a child welfare caseworker, or an educator,
the State’s Attorney shall also make a recommendation as to whether a summons or
warrant should issue.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Code or the Maryland Rules, a
statement of charges for an offense allegedly committed in the course of executing the
duties of the law enforcement officer, emergency services personnel, adult protective
services worker, child welfare caseworker, or the educator may not be filed against a law
enforcement officer, emergency services personnel, an adult protective services worker, a
child welfare caseworker, or educator until the State’s Attorney has investigated the
circumstances of the matter and made recommendations to the District Court
Commissioner in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(e) This section may not be construed to preclude the State’s Attorney from
making a determination that an information should be filed against a law enforcement
officer, emergency services personnel, an adult protective services worker, a child welfare
caseworker, or an educator or that a grand jury should be convened to determine whether
an indictment should be filed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.